Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB427.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.2951 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Beginning with the 2012-2013 academic year and each academic year thereafter
]For first-time students enrolling in a public college or university, postsecondary
education institutions shall[are encouraged to] limit the credit-hour requirements to
sixty (60) credit hours for each associate [of science or associate of arts ]degree
program and to one hundred twenty (120) credit hours for each bachelor [of arts or
bachelor of science ]degree program, except in situations in which:
(a) [Quality and content of a program would be negatively impacted; or
(b) ]A program must comply with specific program standards established by
external accreditation bodies;
(b) The program has submitted appropriate documentation from the external
accreditation body to the council demonstrating the necessity of the
additional hours required for the specific program; and
(c) The council affirms the necessity of the additional hours required for the
specific program.
(2) The council[ on Postsecondary Education], in collaboration with the public
universities and community and technical colleges, shall:
(a) Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide agreement for
alignment of Kentucky Community and Technical College System lower-
division associate of arts and associate of science coursework that shall be
accepted and fully credited to related bachelors degree programs by all public
universities. The agreement shall specify the general education learning
outcomes and program-specific prerequisite learning outcomes of the
coursework. Where applicable, curricula shall be reviewed to determine
comparability of core content standards required under KRS 164.302. The
Page 1 of 5
BR083700.100 - 837 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 837
agreement shall direct that the associate of arts and associate of science
coursework meeting the learning outcomes specified shall be accepted for
transfer and degree credit, whether earned as individual courses or within
block programs;
(b) Develop, implement, and maintain a Kentucky Community and Technical
College System statewide course numbering system for lower-division
general education and program-specific prerequisite courses that include the
same learning outcomes;
(c) By July 1, 2026, develop, implement, and maintain statewide transfer
pathways consisting of sixty (60) credit hours that shall be applied to the
requirements of high-demand baccalaureate degree programs at any
institution.
1. High-demand baccalaureate degree programs shall be defined by the
council based on student and workforce demands. Once a statewide
transfer pathway has been developed and implemented by the council,
it shall be maintained, even if the council determines the pathway is
no longer in a high-demand baccalaureate program. The council shall
publish on its website a list of the existing statewide transfer pathways
available to students.
2. Each statewide transfer pathway shall consist of sixty (60) credit hours
that shall be available for transfer and application to degree
requirements in the corresponding degree program at each institution.
Students may earn credit in statewide transfer pathways through any
means prescribed by the institution, including but not limited to credit
for prior learning and dual credit as defined by the council.
(d) Establish a statewide course classification system and procedures to monitor
the transfer and crediting of lower-division coursework, including a system of
Page 2 of 5
BR083700.100 - 837 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 837
ongoing assessment that ensures comparability for transfer purposes;
(e)[(d)] Establish a procedure for approval of changes in learning outcomes at
public universities as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(f)[(e)] Standardize credit-by-exam equivalencies and common passing scores
for national exams transferable for general education courses and program-
specific prerequisites courses;
(g)[(f)] Develop policies to align statewide articulation and transfer procedures
across educational institutions, including admissions criteria, student
declaration of major, and student guidance and counseling policies designed
to ensure that students pursuing an associate of arts or associate of science
degree program provide timely notification of their intention to transfer to a
public university;
(h)[(g)] Develop uniform data collection and reporting methods to facilitate and
ensure statewide and institutional compliance with course transfer and credit
requirements;
(i)[(h)] Guarantee that, upon admission to a public university, graduates of an
associate of arts or an associate of science degree program approved by the
council in consultation with public universities shall be deemed to have met
all general education requirements;
(j)[(i)] Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of
science degree programs of Kentucky public postsecondary institutions who
complete the prerequisite learning outcomes for a bachelor of arts or bachelor
of science program while fulfilling the requirements for an associate of art or
associate of science degree, shall not be required to repeat or to take any
additional lower-level courses to fulfill bachelor degree requirements in the
same major, and these students shall be granted admission to related upper-
division bachelors degree programs of a state public college or university on
Page 3 of 5
BR083700.100 - 837 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 837
the same criteria as those students earning lower-division credits at the
university to which the student transferred;
(k)[(j)] Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of
science degree programs shall receive priority for admission to a state public
university over out-of-state students if they meet the same admission criteria;
(l)[(k)] Establish a commonality in college transcripts to be used in all public
colleges and universities to facilitate transfer from community and technical
colleges;
(m)[(l)] Encourage private colleges and universities to collaborate with public
educational institutions in developing programs and agreement to expedite the
transfer of students and credits between institutions;
(n)[(m)] Establish an appeals process to resolve disagreements between
transferring students and receiving educational institutions regarding the
transfer and acceptance of credits earned at another institution;
(o)[(n)] Ensure that all articulation and transfer policies are consistent with the
rules and regulations established by all appropriate discipline-specific
accrediting bodies and institutional accrediting agencies as recognized by the
United States Department of Education; and
(p)[(o)] Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide
standardized articulation agreement to be executed [by July 1, 2021, ]between
public colleges and universities and the Kentucky Department of Education
for each approved high school career pathway that leads to a postsecondary
credential, certification, license, or degree. Upon meeting the requirements of
the standardized articulation agreement, a student shall be awarded
postsecondary credit for prior learning at any public college or university.
(3) When an institution seeks to change learning outcomes for a bachelor of arts or
bachelor of science program that affect lower-division courses, the university shall
Page 4 of 5
BR083700.100 - 837 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 837
notify the council [on Postsecondary Education and the Kentucky Community and
Technical College System ]of the proposed changes at the same time as the
initiation of the university's approval process. If it is determined that the proposed
change will have an adverse effect on transferability, the university proposing the
change shall enter into discussion with the council, the other public universities,
and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System to verify there
remains a clearly defined path to transfer credits[a bachelor's degree] for those
students who plan to transfer from the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System or another public university to the public university.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2026, any student who transfers among public postsecondary
institutions shall be awarded credit by the receiving institution for courses
satisfactorily completed by the student at the previous institutions when the credit
was part of a statewide transfer pathway available at both the earning institution
and the receiving institution.
(5) Beginning July 1, 2026, participating institutions receiving transfer course credit
within a statewide transfer pathway shall accept and apply general education
courses and credit in the equivalent pathway at the receiving institution. The
credit shall be applied as first satisfying general education core course credit
requirements and program specific general education course credit requirements
before applying the course credit as elective credit.
Page 5 of 5
BR083700.100 - 837 - XXXX 2/20/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed